Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB713.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8340.12(2) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.836, No.72), is amended to read:§ 8340.12. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:* * *(2) It is in the public interest to encourage continued participation in matters of public significance, including disclosure of sexual offenses. This participation should not be chilled through abuse of the judicial process.* * *Section 2. The definition of "protected public expression" <--<--123456789101112131415161718 in section 8340.13 of Title 42, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.836, No.72), is amended to read:§ 8340.13. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Protected public expression." A person's:(1) communication in a legislative, executive, judicial or administrative proceeding;(2) communication on an issue under consideration or review in a legislative, executive, judicial or administrative proceeding; [or](3) exercise, on a matter of public concern, of the rights of freedom of speech or of the press, the right to assemble or petition or the right of association, guaranteed by:(i) the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States; or(ii) section 7 or 20 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania[.]; or(4) communication of an allegation of abuse, as defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions), or allegation of sexual violence, as defined under section 62A03 (relating to definitions), provided the communication is not malicious.* * *Section 3. Section 8340.14(b)(5) of Title 42, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.836, No.72), is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 8340.14(B)(5) OF TITLE 42 OF THE 20250HB0713PN2872 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 8340.14. Scope of subchapter.* * *(b) Exclusions.--This subchapter does not apply to any of the following claims asserted in a civil action:* * *(5) Arising under [any of the following:(i) 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse).(ii) Chapter 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation).(iii) The] the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.* * *Section 4 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0713PN2872 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415